Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-186
Thomas.

The county of Thomas is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range twenty-six, west, of the sixth principal meridian, running thence north along the west line of Blaine County to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range twenty-six, west; thence west along the south line of Cherry County to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range thirty, west; thence south along said range line, to the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range thirty, west; thence east along the north line of Logan County to the place of beginning.

Laws 1887, c. 24, § 1, p. 347;

R.S.1913, § 901;

C.S.1922, § 803;

C.S.1929, § 25-190;

R.S.1943, § 22-186.